Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1073
Public safety answering point; report.

(1) Each public safety answering point shall report to the commission annually (a) the name and location of the public safety answering point and (b) whether next-generation 911 service is provided at that public safety answering point.

(2) The commission shall compile and place the information required in this section into its annual telecommunications report to the Legislature.

Laws 2001, LB 585, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2205;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 261;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-460;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 55.

Annual report to Legislature, see section 86-163.